tests/v_выля_del.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "The verb выля":
    выля<v><tv><pres><p1><sg> : вылятӑп
    выля<v><tv><pres><p2><sg> : вылятӑн
    выля<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : вылятӑть
    выля<v><tv><pres><p1><pl> : вылятпӑр
    выля<v><tv><pres><p2><pl> : вылятӑр
    выля<v><tv><pres><p3><pl> : выляҫҫӗ
    выля<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : вылям
    выля<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : выля
    выля<v><tv><imp><p3><sg> : вылятӑр
    выля<v><tv><imp><p1><pl> : выляр
    выля<v><tv><imp><p2><pl> : выльӑр
    выля<v><tv><imp><p3><pl> : выляччӑр
    выля<v><tv><fut><p1><sg> : выльӑп
    выля<v><tv><fut><p2><sg> : выльӑн
    выля<v><tv><fut><p3><sg> : вылӗ
    выля<v><tv><fut><p1><pl> : выльӑпӑр
    выля<v><tv><fut><p2><pl> : выльӑр
    выля<v><tv><fut><p3><pl> : вылӗҫ
    выля<v><tv><cond><p1><sg> : выльӑттӑм
    выля<v><tv><cond><p2><sg> : выльӑттӑн
    выля<v><tv><cond><p3><sg> : вылӗччӗ
    выля<v><tv><cond><p1><pl> : выльӑттӑмӑр
    выля<v><tv><cond><p2><pl> : выльӑттӑр
    выля<v><tv><cond><p3><pl> : вылӗччӗҫ
    выля<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : выльӑпин
    выля<v><tv><opt><p2><sg> : выльӑсӑн
    выля<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : вылин
    выля<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : выльӑпӑрин
    выля<v><tv><opt><p2><pl> : выльӑсӑр
    выля<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : вылӗҫин
    выля<v><tv><abil><pres><p1><sg> : выляятӑп
    выля<v><tv><abil><pres><p2><sg> : выляятӑн
    выля<v><tv><abil><pres><p3><sg> : выляятӑть
    выля<v><tv><abil><pres><p1><pl> : выляятпӑр
    выля<v><tv><abil><pres><p2><pl> : выляятӑр
    выля<v><tv><abil><pres><p3><pl> : выляяҫҫӗ
